src/fst/morphology/stems/ojibwe_nouns.lexc
+NI+Poss+Pret+Sg+3SgProxPoss:imiban EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Poss+Sg+3PlObvPoss:iminiw1 EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Poss+Sg+3PlProxPoss:imiwaa EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Poss+Sg+3SgObvPoss:iminiw1 EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Poss+Sg+3SgProxPoss:im EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pret+Pl+3PlObvPoss:iniban EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pret+Pl+3PlProxPoss:iwaabanen EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pret+Pl+3PlProxPoss:iwaabaniin EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pret+Pl+3SgObvPoss:iniban EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pret+Pl+3SgProxPoss:ibanen EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pret+Pl+3SgProxPoss:ibaniin EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pret+Sg+3PlObvPoss:iniban EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pret+Sg+3PlProxPoss:iwaaban EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pret+Sg+3SgObvPoss:iniban EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pret+Sg+3SgProxPoss:iban EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Sg+3PlObvPoss:iniw1 EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Sg+3PlProxPoss:iwaa EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Sg+3SgObvPoss:iniw1 EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Sg+3SgProxPoss: EncliticRoot ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: NI, Class: NI_Vw                                           !
!         Morpheme boundary between stem and suffix                            !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON NI_Class=NI_Vw_Boundary
0:%>%> NI_Class=NI_Vw_Flags ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: NI, Class: NI_Vw                                           !
!         Flag diacritic governing combinations between                        !
!         prefix and ending                                                    !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON NI_Class=NI_Vw_Flags
@R.Prefix.GI@ NI_Class=NI_Vw_Flags_Prefix=GI ;
@R.Prefix.NI@ NI_Class=NI_Vw_Flags_Prefix=NI ;
@R.Prefix.NONE@ NI_Class=NI_Vw_Flags_Prefix=NONE ;
@R.Prefix.O@ NI_Class=NI_Vw_Flags_Prefix=O ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: NI, Class: NI_Vw                                           !
!         Flag diacritic governing combinations between                        !
!         prefix and ending_Prefix=NONE                                        !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON NI_Class=NI_Vw_Flags_Prefix=NONE
@U.Order.Other@ NI_Class=NI_Vw_Prefix=NONE_Order=Other_Endings ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: NI, Class: NI_Vw, Prefix: NONE, Order: Other               !
!         Endings                                                              !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON NI_Class=NI_Vw_Prefix=NONE_Order=Other_Endings
+NI+Dim+Loc:V1nsing EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Dim+Loc:ensing EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Dim+LocDist:V1nsikaang EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Dim+LocDist:ensikaang EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Dim+Pej+Loc:V1nzhishing EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Dim+Pej+Loc:enzhishing EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Dim+Pej+LocDist:V1nzhishikaang EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Dim+Pej+LocDist:enzhishikaang EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Dim+Pej+Pl:V1nzhishan EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Dim+Pej+Pl:enzhishan EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Dim+Pej+Sg:V1nzhish EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Dim+Pej+Sg:enzhish EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Dim+Pl:V1nsan EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Dim+Pl:ensan EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Dim+Pret+Loc:V1nsibaning EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Dim+Pret+Loc:ensibaning EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Dim+Pret+LocDist:V1nsibanikaang EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Dim+Pret+LocDist:ensibanikaang EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Dim+Pret+Pl:V1nsibanen EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Dim+Pret+Pl:V1nsibaniin EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Dim+Pret+Pl:ensibanen EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Dim+Pret+Pl:ensibaniin EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Dim+Pret+Sg:V1nsiban EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Dim+Pret+Sg:ensiban EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Dim+Sg:V1ns EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Dim+Sg:ens EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Loc:V1ng EncliticRoot ;
+NI+LocDist:V1kaang EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pej+Loc:ishing EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pej+LocDist:ishikaang EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pej+Pl:ishan EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pej+Sg:ish EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pl:V1n EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pl:an EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pret+Loc:ibaning EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pret+LocDist:ibanikaang EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pret+Pl:ibanen EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pret+Pl:ibaniin EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pret+Sg:iban EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Sg: EncliticRoot ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: NI, Class: NI_Vw                                           !
!         Flag diacritic governing combinations between                        !
!         prefix and ending_Prefix=NI                                          !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON NI_Class=NI_Vw_Flags_Prefix=NI
@U.Order.Other@ NI_Class=NI_Vw_Prefix=NI_Order=Other_Endings ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: NI, Class: NI_Vw, Prefix: NI, Order: Other                 !
!         Endings                                                              !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON NI_Stems
agikokaa-mashkiki:agikokaa-mashkikiw2 NI_Class=NI_Vw_Boundary ;
aniibiishaabo:aniibiishaabow2 NI_Class=NI_Vw_Boundary ;
anishinaabe-mashkiki:anishinaabe-mashkikiw2 NI_Class=NI_Vw_Boundary ;
baawitigwaabo:baawitigwaabow2 NI_Class=NI_Vw_Boundary ;
bakwezhiganaabo:bakwezhiganaabow2 NI_Class=NI_Vw_Boundary ;
biinaakizige-mashkiki:biinaakizige-mashkikiw2 NI_Class=NI_Vw_Boundary ;
bingwaabo:bingwaabow2 NI_Class=NI_Vw_Boundary ;
bizhikiiwaabo:bizhikiiwaabow2 NI_Class=NI_Vw_Boundary ;
bizhikiwaanzo:bizhikiwaanzow2 NI_Class=NI_Vw_Boundary ;
dakaagamaabo:dakaagamaabow2 NI_Class=NI_Vw_Boundary ;
dakigamaabo:dakigamaabow2 NI_Class=NI_Vw_Boundary ;
dakiigamaabo:dakiigamaabow2 NI_Class=NI_Vw_Boundary ;
dewikwe-mashkiki:dewikwe-mashkikiw2 NI_Class=NI_Vw_Boundary ;
dewikwe-mashkikiwaabo:dewikwe-mashkikiwaabow2 NI_Class=NI_Vw_Boundary ;
dinowaabo:dinowaabow2 NI_Class=NI_Vw_Boundary ;
doodooshaabo:doodooshaabow2 NI_Class=NI_Vw_Boundary ;
gibiskwe-mashkiki:gibiskwe-mashkikiw2 NI_Class=NI_Vw_Boundary ;
gichi-doodooshaabo:gichi-doodooshaabow2 NI_Class=NI_Vw_Boundary ;
gichi-oodena:gichi-oodenaw2 NI_Class=NI_Vw_Boundary ;
gichi-ziibi:gichi-ziibiw2 NI_Class=NI_Vw_Boundary ;
gichigamiiwaabo:gichigamiiwaabow2 NI_Class=NI_Vw_Boundary ;
giizhikaandagaabo:giizhikaandagaabow2 NI_Class=NI_Vw_Boundary ;
gimiwanaabo:gimiwanaabow2 NI_Class=NI_Vw_Boundary ;
ginoozensiwi-naboobiiwaabo:ginoozensiwi-naboobiiwaabow2 NI_Class=NI_Vw_Boundary ;
giziibiiga'iganaabo:giziibiiga'iganaabow2 NI_Class=NI_Vw_Boundary ;
giziininaaganaabo:giziininaaganaabow2 NI_Class=NI_Vw_Boundary ;
ikwa'ibiiwaabo:ikwa'ibiiwaabow2 NI_Class=NI_Vw_Boundary ;
ishkodewaabo:ishkodewaabow2 NI_Class=NI_Vw_Boundary ;
ishkwe-oodena:ishkwe-oodenaw2 NI_Class=NI_Vw_Boundary ;
maji-mashkiki:maji-mashkikiw2 NI_Class=NI_Vw_Boundary ;
makade-mashkikiwaabo:makade-mashkikiwaabow2 NI_Class=NI_Vw_Boundary ;
mashkiigobagwaabo:mashkiigobagwaabow2 NI_Class=NI_Vw_Boundary ;
mashkiigwaabo:mashkiigwaabow2 NI_Class=NI_Vw_Boundary ;
mashkiki:mashkikiw2 NI_Class=NI_Vw_Boundary ;
mashkikiiwaabo:mashkikiiwaabow2 NI_Class=NI_Vw_Boundary ;
mashkikiwaabo:mashkikiwaabow2 NI_Class=NI_Vw_Boundary ;
mashkosi:mashkosiw2 NI_Class=NI_Vw_Boundary ;
mishiiminaabo:mishiiminaabow2 NI_Class=NI_Vw_Boundary ;
miskominaganzhiiwaabo:miskominaganzhiiwaabow2 NI_Class=NI_Vw_Boundary ;
miskomini-zhiiwaabo:miskomini-zhiiwaabow2 NI_Class=NI_Vw_Boundary ;
mookijiwanibiigwaabo:mookijiwanibiigwaabow2 NI_Class=NI_Vw_Boundary ;
mookijiwanibiiwaabo:mookijiwanibiiwaabow2 NI_Class=NI_Vw_Boundary ;
mookise-mashkiki:mookise-mashkikiw2 NI_Class=NI_Vw_Boundary ;
naboobiiwaabo:naboobiiwaabow2 NI_Class=NI_Vw_Boundary ;
neyaashi:neyaashiw2 NI_Class=NI_Vw_Boundary ;
nibe-mashkiki:nibe-mashkikiw2 NI_Class=NI_Vw_Boundary ;
nibewi-mashkiki:nibewi-mashkikiw2 NI_Class=NI_Vw_Boundary ;
nitiiwaabo:nitiiwaabow2 NI_Class=NI_Vw_Boundary ;
omigii-mashkiki:omigii-mashkikiw2 NI_Class=NI_Vw_Boundary ;
oodena:oodenaw2 NI_Class=NI_Vw_Boundary ;
ososodamoo-mashkiki:ososodamoo-mashkikiw2 NI_Class=NI_Vw_Boundary ;
ozaawi-mishiiminaabo:ozaawi-mishiiminaabow2 NI_Class=NI_Vw_Boundary ;
ozaawi-zhiiwaabo:ozaawi-zhiiwaabow2 NI_Class=NI_Vw_Boundary ;
ozaawiminagi-zhiiwaabo:ozaawiminagi-zhiiwaabow2 NI_Class=NI_Vw_Boundary ;
ozhaawashko-aniibiishaabo:ozhaawashko-aniibiishaabow2 NI_Class=NI_Vw_Boundary ;
ozhibii'iganaabo:ozhibii'iganaabow2 NI_Class=NI_Vw_Boundary ;
ozhiga'iganaabo:ozhiga'iganaabow2 NI_Class=NI_Vw_Boundary ;
ozhobii'iganaabo:ozhobii'iganaabow2 NI_Class=NI_Vw_Boundary ;
ozosodamoo-mashkiki:ozosodamoo-mashkikiw2 NI_Class=NI_Vw_Boundary ;
waakamiwaabo:waakamiwaabow2 NI_Class=NI_Vw_Boundary ;
wazhashkwaanzo:wazhashkwaanzow2 NI_Class=NI_Vw_Boundary ;
wiibidaa-mashkiki:wiibidaa-mashkikiw2 NI_Class=NI_Vw_Boundary ;
wiiyaasiwaabo:wiiyaasiwaabow2 NI_Class=NI_Vw_Boundary ;
zaaga'iganiiwaabo:zaaga'iganiiwaabow2 NI_Class=NI_Vw_Boundary ;
zagime-mashkiki:zagime-mashkikiw2 NI_Class=NI_Vw_Boundary ;
zhaabwiminaabo:zhaabwiminaabow2 NI_Class=NI_Vw_Boundary ;
zhawiminaabo:zhawiminaabow2 NI_Class=NI_Vw_Boundary ;
zhiishiibaabo:zhiishiibaabow2 NI_Class=NI_Vw_Boundary ;
zhiiwaabo:zhiiwaabow2 NI_Class=NI_Vw_Boundary ;
zhiiwitaaganaabo:zhiiwitaaganaabow2 NI_Class=NI_Vw_Boundary ;
zhingobiiwaabo:zhingobiiwaabow2 NI_Class=NI_Vw_Boundary ;
zhinobaabo:zhinobaabow2 NI_Class=NI_Vw_Boundary ;
zhizhoobii'iganaabo:zhizhoobii'iganaabow2 NI_Class=NI_Vw_Boundary ;
zhizhoobiigii-mashkiki:zhizhoobiigii-mashkikiw2 NI_Class=NI_Vw_Boundary ;
zhoominaabo:zhoominaabow2 NI_Class=NI_Vw_Boundary ;
zhooniyaawaabo:zhooniyaawaabow2 NI_Class=NI_Vw_Boundary ;
ziibi:ziibiw2 NI_Class=NI_Vw_Boundary ;
ziibiiwaabo:ziibiiwaabow2 NI_Class=NI_Vw_Boundary ;
ziinzibaakwadwaabo:ziinzibaakwadwaabow2 NI_Class=NI_Vw_Boundary ;
